Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-824
Joint entity; bonds and property; exempt from taxation; when.

(1) All bonds of a joint entity are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

(2) The property of a joint entity to the extent it is used for a public purpose, including any pro rata share of any property owned by a joint entity in conjunction with any other person, is declared to be public property of a governmental subdivision of the state. Such property and the income of a joint entity shall be exempt from all taxes of the state or any political subdivision of the state and shall be exempt from all special assessments of any participating municipality if used for a public purpose.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 11.